Utah statutes.
9-8-308.   Forgery or false labeling of specimens unlawful.

It is unlawful to reproduce, rework, or forge any specimen or make any object, whether copied or not, or falsely label, describe, identify, or offer for sale or exchange any object, with intent to represent it as an original and genuine specimen.  No person may offer for sale or other exchange any object with knowledge that it was collected or excavated in violation of this part.



Renumbered and Amended by Chapter 241, 1992 General Session

